Illinois, session 104th, HB4197.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing 6Section 2705-275 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-275)  (was 20 ILCS 2705/49.25j)8    Sec. 2705-275. Grants for airport facilities. 9    (a) In this Section, "project labor agreement" means a 10prehire collective bargaining agreement that covers all terms 11and conditions of employment on a specific construction 12project and that meets the requirements described in Section 1325 of the Project Labor Agreements Act. 14    (b) The Department may make grants to municipalities and 15airport authorities for the renovation, construction, and 16development of airport facilities. A grant made under this 17Section must include a condition that the renovation, 18construction, and development of airport facilities is covered 19by a project labor agreement entered into with the local 20building and construction trades council having geographic 21jurisdiction over the airport facilities. The grants may be 22made from funds appropriated for that purpose from the Build 23Illinois Bond Fund.  HB4197- 2 -LRB104 16223 RTM 29607 b1(Source: P.A. 94-91, eff. 7-1-05.) 2    Section 10. The Airport Authorities Act is amended by 3adding Section 15.3 as follows: 4    (70 ILCS 5/15.3 new)5    Sec. 15.3. Project Labor Agreement.6    (a) In this Section, "project labor agreement" means a 7prehire collective bargaining agreement that covers all terms 8and conditions of employment on a specific construction 9project and that meets the requirements described in Section 1025 of the Project Labor Agreements Act.11    (b) Any contract entered into by an airport authority to 12construct, develop, expand, extend, or improve any airport or 13airport facility must include a project labor agreement 14entered into with the local building and construction trades 15council having geographic jurisdiction over the airport or 16airport facility. 17    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 18Section 8.50 as follows: 19    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)20    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 218 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 22the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory   HB4197- 3 -LRB104 16223 RTM 29607 b1Act of the 104th General Assembly.